Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-702
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that the retail distribution and sales of agricultural and industrial equipment utilizing independent retail businesses operating under agreements with manufacturers, wholesalers, and distributors of such equipment vitally affect the general economy, public interests, and public welfare of the state and that it is necessary to regulate the business relationships between the independent dealers and the equipment manufacturers, wholesalers, and distributors.

Laws 1991, LB 123, § 2.